Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Registrations

§ 5421.
Application.

A person who desires to be registered under this chapter shall apply for a registration in the manner specified by the Director, accompanied by payment of the required fee.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5422.
Registration by endorsement.

The Director may issue a registration to an individual under this chapter if the individual holds a license, registration, certification, or other authorization to practice massage therapy or bodywork from a U.S. or Canadian jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5423.
Establishments; designee and inspection.

An establishment shall designate a massage therapist, bodyworker, or touch professional to be responsible for ensuring the establishment complies with the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted by the Director.

A person authorized by the Director may enter any establishment for the purpose of inspection when a complaint has been filed with the Office regarding the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork at that establishment. A fee shall not be charged for any inspection under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5424.
Registration renewal.

A registration under this chapter shall be renewed every two years by submission of a new, completed application and shall be accompanied by payment of the required fee.

A registration that has lapsed shall be renewed upon payment of the biennial renewal fee and the late renewal penalty.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5425.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay those fees set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 125(b)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5426.
Display of registration.

A massage therapist, bodyworker, or touch professional shall conspicuously display his or her registration in any establishment where the registrant is engaged in the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 5427.
Unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct means the conduct set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

and the following:

engaging in activities in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 2605

(voyeurism);

engaging in a sexual act with a client;

conviction of a crime committed while engaged in the practice of massage or the practice of bodywork;

performing massage or bodywork that the massage therapist, bodyworker, or touch professional knows or has reason to know has not been authorized by a client or the client’s legal representative; and

engaging in conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. April 1, 2021.